Computer security From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia    Redirected from IT security  Jump to navigation Jump to search The protection of computer systems from theft or damage This article is part of a series on Information security Related security categories Internet security Automotive security Cyberwarfare Computer security Mobile security Network security Threats Advanced Persistent Threat Computer crime Vulnerabilities Eavesdropping Malware Spyware Ransomware Trojans Viruses Worms Rootkits Bootkits Keyloggers Screen scrapers Exploits Backdoors Logic bombs Payloads Denial of service Web shells Phishing Defenses Computer access control Defence in Depth Application security Antivirus software Secure coding Secure by default Secure by design Secure operating systems Authentication Multi-factor authentication Authorization Data-centric security Encryption Firewall Intrusion detection system Mobile secure gateway Runtime application self-protection RASP v t e This article is part of a series on Computer hacking History Phreaking Cryptovirology Hacking of consumer electronics List of hackers Hacker culture  ethic Hacker Manifesto Black hat Grey hat White hat Hackerspace Hackathon Hacktivism Maker culture Conferences Black Hat Briefings Chaos Communication Congress DEF CON Hackers on Planet Earth Computer crime Crimeware List of computer criminals Script kiddie Hacking tools Forensics OS Vulnerability Exploit Payload Social engineering Practice sites HackThisSite Zone-H Malware Rootkit Backdoor Trojan horse Virus Worm Spyware Ransomware Logic bomb Botnet Keystroke logging HIDS Web shell Computer security Application security Network security Groups Anonymous Chaos Computer Club Homebrew Computer Club defunct Legion of Doom defunct Masters of Deception defunct Red and Blue Teams Publications 2600 The Hacker Quarterly Hacker News Nuts and Volts Phrack v t e While most aspects of computer security involve digital measures such as electronic passwords and encryption, physical security measures such as metal locks are still used to prevent unauthorized tampering. Computer security , cybersecurity 1  or information technology security  IT security  is the protection of computer systems from the theft of or damage to their hardware , software , or electronic data , as well as from the disruption or misdirection of the services they provide. The field is becoming more important due to increased reliance on computer systems, the Internet 2  and wireless network standards such as Bluetooth and Wi-Fi , and due to the growth of smart devices , including smartphones , televisions , and the various devices that constitute the  Internet of things . Owing to its complexity, both in terms of politics and technology, cybersecurity is also one of the major challenges in the contemporary world. 3  Contents 1 Vulnerabilities and attacks 1.1 Backdoor 1.2 Denial-of-service attack 1.3 Direct-access attacks 1.4 Eavesdropping 1.5 Multi-vector, polymorphic attacks 1.6 Phishing 1.7 Privilege escalation 1.8 Social engineering 1.9 Spoofing 1.10 Tampering 2 Information security culture 3 Systems at risk 3.1 Financial systems 3.2 Utilities and industrial equipment 3.3 Aviation 3.4 Consumer devices 3.5 Large corporations 3.6 Automobiles 3.7 Government 3.8 Internet of things and physical vulnerabilities 3.8.1 Medical systems 3.9 Energy sector 4 Impact of security breaches 5 Attacker motivation 6 Computer protection countermeasures 6.1 Security by design 6.2 Security architecture 6.3 Security measures 6.4 Vulnerability management 6.5 Reducing vulnerabilities 6.6 Hardware protection mechanisms 6.7 Secure operating systems 6.8 Secure coding 6.9 Capabilities and access control lists 6.10 End user security training 6.11 Response to breaches 6.12 Types of security and privacy 7 Incident response planning 8 Notable attacks and breaches 8.1 Robert Morris and the first computer worm 8.2 Rome Laboratory 8.3 TJX customer credit card details 8.4 Stuxnet attack 8.5 Global surveillance disclosures 8.6 Target and Home Depot breaches 8.7 Office of Personnel Management data breach 8.8 Ashley Madison breach 9 Legal issues and global regulation 10 Role of government 11 International actions 11.1 Europe 12 National actions 12.1 Computer emergency response teams 12.1.1 Canada 12.1.2 China 12.1.3 Germany 12.1.4 India 12.1.5 South Korea 12.1.6 United States 12.1.6.1 Legislation 12.1.6.2 Agencies 12.1.6.3 Computer emergency readiness team 13 Modern warfare 14 Careers 14.1 Security analyst 14.2 Security engineer 14.3 Security architect 14.4 Security administrator 14.5 Chief Information Security Officer CISO 14.6 Chief Security Officer CSO 14.7 Security ConsultantSpecialistIntelligence 15 Terminology 16 Scholars 17 See also 18 References 19 Further reading 20 External links Vulnerabilities and attacks  edit  Main article Vulnerability computing A vulnerability is a weakness in design, implementation, operation or internal control. Most of the vulnerabilities that have been discovered are documented in the Common Vulnerabilities and Exposures CVE database. An exploitable vulnerability is one for which at least one working attack or  exploit exists. 4  Vulnerabilities are often hunted or exploited with the aid of automated tools or manually using customized scripts. To secure a computer system, it is important to understand the attacks that can be made against it, and these threats can typically be classified into one of these categories below Backdoor  edit  A backdoor in a computer system, a cryptosystem or an algorithm, is any secret method of bypassing normal authentication or security controls. They may exist for a number of reasons, including by original design or from poor configuration. They may have been added by an authorized party to allow some legitimate access, or by an attacker for malicious reasons but regardless of the motives for their existence, they create a vulnerability. Denial-of-service attack  edit  Denial of service attacks DoS are designed to make a machine or network resource unavailable to its intended users. 5  Attackers can deny service to individual victims, such as by deliberately entering a wrong password enough consecutive times to cause the victims account to be locked, or they may overload the capabilities of a machine or network and block all users at once. While a network attack from a single IP address can be blocked by adding a new firewall rule, many forms of Distributed denial of service DDoS attacks are possible, where the attack comes from a large number of points  and defending is much more difficult. Such attacks can originate from the zombie computers of a botnet , but a range of other techniques are possible including reflection and amplification attacks , where innocent systems are fooled into sending traffic to the victim. Direct-access attacks  edit  An unauthorized user gaining physical access to a computer is most likely able to directly copy data from it. They may also compromise security by making operating system modifications, installing software worms , keyloggers , covert listening devices or using wireless mice. 6  Even when the system is protected by standard security measures, these may be able to be by-passed by booting another operating system or tool from a CD-ROM or other bootable media. Disk encryption and Trusted Platform Module are designed to prevent these attacks. Eavesdropping  edit  Eavesdropping is the act of surreptitiously listening to a private computer conversation communication, typically between hosts on a network. For instance, programs such as Carnivore and NarusInSight have been used by the FBI and NSA to eavesdrop on the systems of internet service providers . Even machines that operate as a closed system i.e., with no contact to the outside world can be eavesdropped upon via monitoring the faint electromagnetic transmissions generated by the hardware TEMPEST is a specification by the NSA referring to these attacks. Multi-vector, polymorphic attacks  edit  Surfacing in 2017, a new class of multi-vector, 7  polymorphic 8  cyber threats surfaced that combined several types of attacks and changed form to avoid cyber security controls as they spread. These threats have been classified as fifth generation cyber attacks. 9  Phishing  edit  An example of a phishing email, disguised as an official email from a fictional bank. The sender is attempting to trick the recipient into revealing confidential information by confirming it at the phishers website. Note the misspelling of the words received and discrepancy as recieved and discrepency , respectively. Although the URL of the banks webpage appears to be legitimate, the hyperlink points at the phishers webpage. Phishing is the attempt to acquire sensitive information such as usernames, passwords, and credit card details directly from users by deceiving the users. 10  Phishing is typically carried out by email spoofing or instant messaging , and it often directs users to enter details at a fake website whose look and feel are almost identical to the legitimate one. The fake website often asks for personal information, such as log-in details and passwords. This information can then be used to gain access to the individuals real account on the real website. Preying on a victims trust, phishing can be classifi ed as a form of social engineering . Privilege escalation  edit  Privilege escalation describes a situation where an attacker with some level of restricted access is able to, without authorization, elevate their privileges or access level. For example, a standard computer user may be able to exploit a vulnerability in the system to gain access to restricted data or even become  root  and have full unrestricted access to a system. Social engineering  edit  Main article Social engineering security Social engineering aims to convince a user to disclose secrets such as passwords, card numbers, etc. by, for example, impersonating a bank, a contractor, or a customer. 11  A common scam involves fake CEO emails sent to accounting and finance departments. In early 2016, the FBI reported that the scam has cost US businesses more than 2bn in about two years. 12  In May 2016, the Milwaukee Bucks NBA team was the victim of this type of cyber scam with a perpetrator impersonating the teams president Peter Feigin , resulting in the handover of all the teams employees 2015 W-2 tax forms. 13  Spoofing  edit  Main article Spoofing attack Spoofing is the act of masquerading as a valid entity through falsification of data such as an IP address or username, in order to gain access to information or resources that one is otherwise unauthorized to obtain. 14  15  There are several types of spoofing, including Email spoofing , where an attacker forges the sending  From , or source address of an email. IP address spoofing , where an attacker alters the source IP address in a network packet to hide their identity or impersonate another computing system. MAC spoofing , where an attacker modifies the Media Access Control MAC address of their network interface to pose as a valid user on a network. Biometric spoofing, where an attacker produces a fake biometric sample to pose as another user. 16  Tampering  edit  Tampering describes a malicious modification of products. So-called Evil Maid attacks and security services planting of surveillance capability into routers are examples. 17  Information security culture  edit  Employee behavior can have a big impact on information security in organizations. Cultural concepts can help different segments of the organization work effectively or work against effectiveness towards information security within an organization. Information security culture is the ...totality of patterns of behavior in an organization that contribute to the protection of inf ormation of all kinds. 18  Andersson and Reimers 2014 found that employees often do not see themselves as part of the organization information security effort and often take actions that ignore organizational Information Security best interests. 19  Research shows information security culture needs to be improved continuously. In Information Security Culture from Analysis to Change, authors commented, Its a never ending process, a cycle of evaluation and change or maintenance. To manage the information security culture, five steps should be taken pre-evaluation, strategic planning, operative planning, implementation , and post-evaluation. 20  Pre-Evaluation to identify the awareness of information security within employees and to analyze the current security policy. Strategic Planning to come up with a better awareness program, clear targets need to be set. Clustering  definition needed  people is helpful to achieve it. Operative Planning a good security culture can be established based on internal communication, management-buy-in, and security awareness and a training program. 20  Implementation four stages should be used to implement the information security culture. They are Commitment of the management Communication with organizational members Courses for all organizational members Commitment of the employees 20  Post-Evaluation to assess the success of the planning and implementation, and to identify unresolved areas of concern. Systems at risk  edit  The growth in the number of computer systems, and the increasing reliance upon them of individuals, businesses, industries and governments means that there are an increasing number of systems at risk. Financial systems  edit  The computer systems of financial regulators and financial institutions like the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission , SWIFT, investment banks, and commercial banks are prominent hacking targets for cyber criminals interested in manipulating markets and making illicit gains. 21  Web sites and apps that accept or store credit card numbers , brokerage accounts, and bank account information are also prominent hacking targets, because of the potential for immediate financial gain from transferring money, making purchases, or selling the information on the black market . 22  In-store payment systems and ATMs have also been tampered with in order to gather customer account data and PINs . Utilities and industrial equipment  edit  Computers control functions at many utilities, including coordination of telecommunications , the power grid , nuclear power plants , and valve opening and closing in water and gas networks. The Internet is a potential attack vector for such machines if connected, but the Stuxnet worm demonstrated that even equipment controlled by computers not connected to the Internet can be vulnerable. In 2014, the Computer Emergency Readiness Team , a division of the Department of Homeland Security , investigated 79 hacking incidents at energy companies. 23  Vulnerabilities in smart meters many of which use local radio or cellular communications can cause problems with billing fraud. 24  Aviation  edit  The aviation industry is very reliant on a series of complex systems which could be attacked. 25  A simple power outage at one airport can cause repercussions worldwide, 26  much of the system relies on radio transmissions which could be disrupted, 27  and controlling aircraft over oceans is especially dangerous because radar surveillance only extends 175 to 225 miles offshore. 28  There is also potential for attack from within an aircraft. 29  In Europe, with the  Pan-European Network Service  30  and NewPENS, 31  and in the US with the NextGen program, 32  air navigation service providers are moving to create their own dedicated networks. The consequences of a successful attack range from loss of confidentiality to loss of system integrity, air traffic control outages, loss of aircraft, and even loss of life. Consumer devices  edit  Desktop computers and laptops are commonly targeted to gather passwords or financial account information, or to construct a botnet to attack another target. Smartphones , tablet computers , smart watches , and other mobile devices such as quantified self devices like activity trackers have sensors such as cameras, microphones, GPS receivers, compasses, and accelerometers which could be exploited, and may collect personal information, including sensitive health information. WiFi, Bluetooth, and cell phone networks on any of these devices could be used as attack vectors, and sensors might be remotely activated after a successful breach. 33  The increasing number of home automation devices such as the Nest thermostat are also potential targets. 33  Large corporations  edit  Large corporations are common targets. In many cases attacks are aimed at financial gain through identity theft and involve data breaches . Examples include loss of millions of clients credit card details by Home Depot , 34  Staples , 35  Target Corporation , 36  and the most recent breach of Equifax . 37  Some cyberattacks are ordered by foreign governments, which engage in cyberwarfare with the intent to spread their propaganda, sabotage, or spy on their targets. Many people believe the Russian government played a major role in the US presidential election of 2016 by using Twitter and Facebook to affect the results of the election. 38  Medical records have been targeted in general identify theft, health insurance fraud, and impersonating patients to obtain prescription drugs for recreational purposes or resale. 39  Although cyber threats continue to increase, 62 of all organizations did not increase security training for their business in 2015. 40  41  Not all attacks are financially motivated however for example security firm HBGary Federal suffered a serious series of attacks in 2011 from hacktivist group Anonymous in retaliation for the firms CEO claiming to have infiltrated their group, 42  43  and in the Sony Pictures attack of 2014 the motive appears to have been to embarrass with data leaks, and cripple the company by wiping workstations and servers. 44  45  Automobiles  edit  See also Autonomous car   Potential disadvantages , Automated driving system   Risks and liabilities , and Automotive hacking Vehicles are increasingly computerized, with engine timing, cruise control , anti-lock brakes , seat belt tensioners, door locks, airbags and advanced driver-assistance systems on many models. Additionally, connected cars may use WiFi and Bluetooth to communicate with onboard consumer devices and the cell phone network. 46  Self-driving cars are expected to be even more complex. All of these systems carry some security risk, and such issues have gained wide attention. 47  48  49  Simple examples of risk include a malicious compact disc being used as an attack vector, 50  and the cars onboard microphones being used for eavesdropping. However, if access is gained to a cars internal controller area network , the danger is much greater 46   and in a widely publicized 2015 test, hackers remotely carjacked a vehicle from 10 miles away and drove it into a ditch. 51  52  Manufacturers are reacting in a number of ways, with Tesla in 2016 pushing out some security fixes over the air into its cars computer systems. 53  In the area of autonomous vehicles, in September 2016 the United States Department of Transportation announced some initial safety standards, and called for states to come up with uniform policies. 54  55  Government  edit  Government and military computer systems are commonly attacked by activists 56  57  58  59  and foreign powers. 60  61  62  63  Local and regional government infrastructure such as traffic light controls, police and intelligence agency communications, personnel records , student records, 64  and financial systems are also potential targets as they are now all largely computerized. Passports and government ID cards that control access to facilities which use RFID can be vulnerable to cloning . Internet of things and physical vulnerabilities  edit  The Internet of things IoT is the network of physical objects such as devices, vehicles, and buildings that are embedded with electronics , software , sensors , and network connectivity that enables them to collect and exchange data 65   and concerns have been raised that this is being developed without appropriate consideration of the security challenges involved. 66  67  While the IoT creates opportunities for more direct integration of the physical world into computer-based systems, 68  69  it also provides opportunities for misuse. In particular, as the Internet of Things spreads widely, cyber attacks are likely to become an increasingly physical rather than simply virtual threat. 70  If a front doors lock is connected to the Internet, and can be lockedunlocked from a phone, then a criminal could enter the home at the press of a button from a stolen or hacked phone. People could stand to lose much more than their credit card numbers in a world controlled by IoT-enabled devices. Thieves have also used electronic means to circumvent non-Internet-connected h otel door locks. 71  Medical systems  edit  See also Medical device hijack and Medical data breach Medical devices have either been successfully attacked or had potentially deadly vulnerabilities demonstrated, including both in-hospital diagnostic equipment 72  and implanted devices including pacemakers 73  and insulin pumps . 74  There are many reports of hospitals and hospital organizations getting hacked, including ransomware attacks, 75  76  77  78  Windows XP exploits, 79  80  viruses, 81  82  and data breaches of sensitive data stored on hospital servers. 83  76  84  85  86  On 28 December 2016 the US Food and Drug Administration released its recommendations for how medical device manufacturers should maintain the security of Internet-connected devices  but no structure for enforcement. 87  88  Energy sector  edit  In distributed generation systems, the risk of a cyber attack is real, according to Daily Energy Insider . An attack could cause a loss of power in a large area for a long period of time, and such an attack could have just as severe consequences as a natural disaster. The District of Columbia is considering creating a Distributed Energy Resources DER Authority within the city, with the goal being for customers to have more insight into their own energy use and giving the local e lectric utility, Pepco , the chance to better estimate energy demand. The D.C. proposal, however, would allow third-party vendors to create numerous points of energy distribution, which could potentially create more opportunities for cyber attackers to threaten the electric grid. 89  Impact of security breaches  edit  Serious financial damage has been caused by security breaches , but because there is no standard model for estimating the cost of an incident, the only data available is that which is made public by the organizations involved. Several computer security consulting firms produce estimates of total worldwide losses attributable to virus and worm attacks and to hostile digital acts in general. The 2003 loss estimates by these firms range from 13 billion worms and viruses only to 226 billion for all forms of covert attacks. The reliability of these estimates is often challenged the underlying methodology is basically anecdotal. 90  Security breaches continue to cost businesses billions of dollars but a survey revealed that 66 of security staffs do not believe senior leadership takes cyber precautions as a strategic priority. 40   third-party source needed  However, reasonable estimates of the financial cost of security breaches can actually help organizations make rational investment decisions. According to the classic Gordon-Loeb Model analyzing the optimal investment level in information security, one can conclude that the amount a firm spends to protect information should generally be only a small fraction of the expected loss i.e., the expected value of the loss resulting from a cyberinformation security breach . 91  Attacker motivation  edit  As with physical security , the motivations for breaches of computer security vary between attackers. Some are thrill-seekers or vandals , some are activists, others are criminals looking for financial gain. State-sponsored attackers are now common and well resourced, but started with amateurs such as Markus Hess who hacked for the KGB , as recounted by Clifford Stoll in The Cuckoos Egg . Additionally, recent attacker motivations can be traced back to extremist organizations seeking to gain political advantage or disrupt social agendas.  citation needed  The growth of the internet, mobile technologies and inexpensive computing devices that has led to a rise in capabilities but also risk to environments that are deemed as vital to operations. All critical targeted environments are susceptible to compromise and has led to a series of proactive studies on how to migrate the risk by taking into consideration motivations by these t ype of actors. Several stark differences exist between the hacker motivation and that of nation state actors seeking to attack based an ideological preference. 92  A standard part of threat modelling for any particular system is to identify what might motivate an attack on that system, and who might be motivated to breach it. The level and detail of precautions will vary depending on the system to be secured. A home personal computer , bank , and classified military network face very different threats, even when the underlying technologies in use are similar.  citation needed  Computer protection countermeasures  edit  In computer security a countermeasure is an action, device, procedure, or technique that reduces a threat , a vulnerability , or an attack by eliminating or preventing it, by minimizing the harm it can cause, or by discovering and reporting it so that corrective action can be taken. 93  94  95  Some common countermeasures are listed in the following sections Security by design  edit  Main article Secure by design Security by design , or alternately secure by design, means that the software has been designed from the ground up to be secure. In this case, security is considered as a main feature. Some of the techniques in this approach include The principle of least privilege , where each part of the system has only the privileges that are needed for its function. That way even if an attacker gains access to that part, they have only limited access to the whole system. Automated theorem proving to prove the correctness of crucial software subsystems. Code reviews and unit testing , approaches to make modules more secure where formal correctness proofs are not possible. Defense in depth , where the design is such that more than one subsystem needs to be violated to compromise the integrity of the system and the information it holds. Default secure settings, and design to fail secure rather than fail insecure see fail-safe for the equivalent in safety engineering . Ideally, a secure system should require a deliberate, conscious, knowledgeable and free decision on the part of legitimate authorities in order to make it insecure. Audit trails tracking system activity, so that when a security breach occurs, the mechanism and extent of the breach can be determined. Storing audit trails remotely, where they can only be appended to, can keep intruders from covering their tracks. Full disclosure of all vulnerabilities, to ensure that the  window of vulnerability  is kept as short as possible when bugs are discovered. Security architecture  edit  The Open Security Architecture organization defines IT security architecture as the design artifacts that describe how the security controls security countermeasures are positioned, and how they relate to the overall information technology architecture . These controls serve the purpose to maintain the systems quality attributes confidentiality, integrity, availability, accountability and assurance services . 96  Techopedia defines security architecture as a unified security design that addresses the necessities and potential risks involved in a certain scenario or environment. It also specifies when and where to apply security controls. The design process is generally reproducible. The key attributes of security architecture are 97  the relationship of different components and how they depend on each other. the determination of controls based on risk assessment, good practice, finances, and legal matters. the standardization of controls. Security measures  edit  A state of computer security is the conceptual ideal, attained by the use of the three processes threat prevention, detection, and response. These processes are based on various policies and system components, which include the following User account access controls and cryptography can protect systems files and data, respectively. Firewalls are by far the most common prevention systems from a network security perspective as they can if properly configured shield access to internal network services, and block certain kinds of attacks through packet filtering. Firewalls can be both hardware- or software-based. Intrusion Detection System IDS products are designed to detect network attacks in-progress and assist in post-attack forensics , while audit trails and logs serve a similar function for individual systems. Response is necessarily defined by the assessed security requirements of an individual system and may cover the range from simple upgrade of protections to notification of legal authorities, counter-attacks, and the like. In some special cases, a complete destruction of the compromised system is favored, as it may happen that not all the compromised resources are detected. Today, computer security comprises mainly preventive measures, like firewalls or an exit procedure . A firewall can be defined as a way of filtering network data between a host or a network and another network, such as the Internet , and can be implemented as software running on the machine, hooking into the network stack or, in the case of most UNIX -based operating systems such as Linux , built into the operating system kernel  to provide real-time filtering and blocking. Another implementation is a so-called physical firewall, which consists of a separate machine filtering network traffic. Firewalls are common amongst machines that are permanently connected to the Internet . Some organizations are turning to big data platforms, such as Apache Hadoop , to extend data accessibility and machine learning to detect advanced persistent threats . 98  99  However, relatively few organisations maintain computer systems with effective detection systems, and fewer still have organized response mechanisms in place. As a result, as Reuters points out Companies for the first time report they are losing more through electronic theft of data than physical stealing of assets. 100  The primary obstacle to effective eradication of cyber crime could be traced to excessive reliance on firewalls and other automated detection systems. Yet it is basic evidence gathering by using packet capture appliances that puts criminals behind bars.  citation needed  Vulnerability management  edit  Main article Vulnerability management Vulnerability management is the cycle of identifying, and remediating or mitigating vulnerabilities , 101  especially in software and firmware . Vulnerability management is integral to computer security and network security . Vulnerabilities can be discovered with a vulnerability scanner , which analyzes a computer system in search of known vulnerabilities, 102  such as open ports , insecure software configuration, and susceptibility to malware . Beyond vulnerability scanning, many organizations contract outside security auditors to run regular penetration tests against their systems to identify vulnerabilities. In some sectors, this is a contractual requirement. 103  Reducing vulnerabilities  edit  While formal verification of the correctness of computer systems is possible, 104  105  it is not yet common. Operating systems formally verified include seL4 , 106  and SYSGO s PikeOS 107  108   but these make up a very small percentage of the market. Two factor authentication is a method for mitigating unauthorized access to a system or sensitive information. It requires something you know a password or PIN, and something you have a card, dongle, cellphone, or other piece of hardware. This increases security as an unauthorized person needs both of these to gain access. Social engineering and direct computer access physical attacks can only be prevented by non-computer means, which can be difficult to enforce, relative to the sensitivity of the information. Training is often involved to help mitigate this risk, but even in a highly disciplined environments e.g. military organizations, social engineering attacks can still be difficult to fo resee and prevent. Enoculation, derived from inoculation theory , seeks to prevent social engineering and other fraudulent tricks or traps by instilling a resistance to persuasion attempts through exposure to similar or related attempts. 109  It is possible to reduce an attackers chances by keeping systems up to date with security patches and updates, using a security scanner  definition needed  orand hiring competent people responsible for security.This statement is ambiguous. Even systems developed by competent people get penetrated The effects of data lossdamage can be reduced by careful backing up and insurance . Hardware protection mechanisms  edit  See also Computer security compromised by hardware failure While hardware may be a source of insecurity, such as with microchip vulnerabilities maliciously introduced during the manufacturing process, 110  111  hardware-based or assisted computer security also offers an alternative to software-only computer security. Using devices and methods such as dongles , trusted platform modules , intrusion-aware cases, drive locks, disabling USB ports, and mobile-enabled access may be considered more secure due to the physical access or sophisticated backdoor access  required in order to be compromised. Each of these is covered in more detail below. USB dongles are typically used in software licensing schemes to unlock software capabilities, 112  but they can also be seen as a way to prevent unauthorized access to a computer or other devices software. The dongle, or key, essentially creates a secure encrypted tunnel between the software application and the key. The principle is that an encryption scheme on the dongle, such as Advanced Encryption Standard AES provides a stronger measure of security, since it is harder to hack and replicate the dongle than to simply copy the native software to another machine and use it. Another security application for dongles is to use them for accessing web-based content such as cloud software or Virtual Private Networks VPNs. 113  In addition, a USB dongle can be configured to lock or unlock a computer. 114  Trusted platform modules TPMs secure devices by integrating cryptographic capabilities onto access devices, through the use of microprocessors, or so-called computers-on-a-chip. TPMs used in conjunction with server-side software offer a way to detect and authenticate hardware devices, preventing unauthorized network and data access. 115  Computer case intrusion detection refers to a device, typically a push-button switch, which detects when a computer case is opened. The firmware or BIOS is programmed to show an alert to the operator when the computer is booted up the next time. Drive locks are essentially software tools to encrypt hard drives, making them inaccessible to thieves. 116  Tools exist specifically for encrypting external drives as well. 117  Disabling USB ports is a security option for preventing unauthorized and malicious access to an otherwise secure computer. Infected USB dongles connected to a network from a computer inside the firewall are considered by the magazine Network World as the most common hardware threat facing computer networks. Disconnecting or disabling peripheral devices  like camera, GPS, removable storage etc., that are not in use. 118  Mobile-enabled access devices are growing in popularity due to the ubiquitous nature of cell phones. Built-in capabilities such as Bluetooth , the newer Bluetooth low energy LE, Near field communication NFC on non-iOS devices and biometric validation such as thumb print readers, as well as QR code reader software designed for mobile devices, offer new, secure ways for mobile phones to connect to access control systems. These control systems provide computer security and can also be used for controlling access to secure buildings. 119  Secure operating systems  edit  Main article Security-evaluated operating system One use of the term computer security refers to technology that is used to implement secure operating systems . In the 1980s the United States Department of Defense DoD used the Orange Book 120  standards, but the current international standard ISOIEC 15408,  Common Criteria  defines a number of progressively more stringent Evaluation Assurance Levels . Many common operating systems meet the EAL4 standard of being Methodically Designed, Tested and Reviewed, but the formal verification required for the highest levels means that they are uncommon. An example of an EAL6 Semiformally Verified Design and Tested system is Integrity-178B , which is used in the Airbus A380 121  and several military jets. 122  Secure coding  edit  Main article Secure coding In software engineering, secure coding aims to guard against the accidental introduction of security vulnerabilities. It is also possible to create software designed from the ground up to be secure. Such systems are  secure by design . Beyond this, formal verification aims to prove the correctness of the algorithms underlying a system 123  important for cryptographic protocols for example. Capabilities and access control lists  edit  Main articles Access control list and Capability-based security Within computer systems, two of many security models capable of enforcing privilege separation are access control lists ACLs and capability-based security . Using ACLs to confine programs has been proven to be insecure in many situations, such as if the host computer can be tricked into indirectly allowing restricted file access, an issue known as the confused deputy problem . It has also been shown that the promise of ACLs of giving access to an object to only one person can never be guaranteed in practice. Both of these problems are resolved by capabilities. This does not mean practical flaws exist in all ACL-based systems, but only that the designers of certain utilities must take responsibility to ensure that they do not introduce flaws. 124  Capabilities have been mostly restricted to research operating systems , while commercial OSs still use ACLs. Capabilities can, however, also be implemented at the language level, leading to a style of programming that is essentially a refinement of standard object-oriented design. An open source project in the area is the E language . End user security training  edit  The end-user is widely recognized as the weakest link in the security chain 125  and it is estimated that more than 90 of security incidents and breaches involve some kind of human error. 126  127  Among the most commonly recorded forms of errors and misjudgment are poor password management, the inability to recognize misleading URLs and to identify fake websites and dangerous email attachments. A common mistake that users make is saving their useridpassword in their browsers to make it easier to login to banking sites. This is a gift to attackers who have obtained ac cess to a machine by some means. The risk may be mitigated by the use of two-factor authentication. 128  As the human component of cyber risk is particularly relevant in determining the global cyber risk 129  an organization is facing, security awareness training, at all levels, not only provides formal compliance with regulatory and industry mandates but is considered essential 130  in reducing cyber risk and protecting individuals and companies from the great majority of cyber threats. The focus on the end-user represents a profound cultural change for many security practitioners, who have traditionally approached cybersecurity exclusively from a technical perspective, and moves along the lines suggested by major security centers 131  to develop a culture of cyber awareness within the organization, recognizing that a security aware user provides an important line of defense against cyber attacks. Response to breaches  edit  Responding forcefully to attempted security breaches in the manner that one would for attempted physical security breaches is often very difficult for a variety of reasons Identifying attackers is difficult, as they are often in a different jurisdiction to the systems they attempt to breach, and operate through proxies, temporary anonymous dial-up accounts, wireless connections, and other anonymizing procedures which make back tracing difficult and are often located in yet another jurisdiction. If they successfully breach security, they are often able to delete logs to cover their tracks. The sheer number of attempted attacks is so large that organisations cannot spend time pursuing each attacker a typical home user with a permanent e.g., cable modem  connection will be attacked at least several times per day, so more attractive targets could be presumed to see many more. Note however, that most of the sheer bulk of these attacks are made by automated vulnerability scanners and computer worms . Law enforcement officers are often unfamiliar with information technology , and so lack the skills and interest in pursuing attackers. There are also budgetary constraints. It has been argued that the high cost of technology, such as DNA testing, and improved forensics mean less money for other kinds of law enforcement, so the overall rate of criminals not getting dealt with goes up as the cost of the technology increases. In addition, the identification of attackers across a network may require logs from various points in the network and in many countries, the release of these records to law enforcement with the exception of being voluntar ily surrendered by a network administrator or a system administrator  requires a search warrant and, depending on the circumstances, the legal proceedings required can be drawn out to the point where the records are either regularly destroyed, or the information is no longer relevant. The United States government spends the largest amount of money every year on cyber security. The United States has a yearly budget of 28 billion dollars. Canada has the 2nd highest annual budget at 1 billion dollars. Australia has the third highest budget with only 70 million dollars. 132  Types of security and privacy  edit  Access control Anti-keyloggers Anti-malware Anti-spyware Anti-subversion software Anti-tamper software Anti-theft Antivirus software Cryptographic software Computer-aided dispatch CAD Firewall Intrusion detection system IDS Intrusion prevention system IPS Log management software Parental control Records management Sandbox Security information management SIEM Software and operating system updating Incident response planning  edit  Incident response is an organized approach to addressing and managing the aftermath of a computer security incident or compromise with the goal of preventing a breach or thwarting a cyberattack. An incident that is not identified and managed at the time of intrusion, typically escalates to a more impactful event such as a data breach or system failure. The intended outcome of a computer security incident response plan is to limit damage and reduce recovery time and costs. Responding to compromises quickly can mitigate exploited vulnerabilities, restore services and processes and minimize impact and losses. 133  Incident response planning allows an organization to establish a series of best practices to stop an intrusion before it causes damage. Typical incident response plans contain a set of written instructions that outline the organizations response to a cyberattack. Without a documented plan in place, an organization may not successfully detect an intrusion or compromise and stak eholders may not understand their roles, processes and procedures during an escalation, slowing the organizations response and resolution. There are four key components of a computer security incident response plan Preparation  Preparing stakeholders on the procedures for handling computer security incidents or compromises Detection  Analysis  Identifying and investigating suspicious activity to confirm a security incident, prioritizing the response based on impact and coordinating notification of the incident Containment, Eradication  Recovery  Isolating affected systems to prevent escalation and limit impact, pinpointing the genesis of the incident, removing malware, affected systems and bad actors from the environment and restoring systems and data when a threat no longer remains Post Incident Activity  Post mortem analysis of the incident, its root cause and the organizations response with the intent of improving the incident response plan and future response efforts 133  Notable attacks and breaches  edit  Further information List of cyber-attacks and List of data breaches Some illustrative examples of different types of computer security breaches are given below. Robert Morris and the first computer worm  edit  Main article Morris worm In 1988, only 60,000 computers were connected to the Internet, and most were mainframes, minicomputers and professional workstations. On 2 November 1988, many started to slow down, because they were running a malicious code that demanded processor time and that spread itself to other computers  the first internet  computer worm . 134  The software was traced back to 23-year-old Cornell University graduate student Robert Tappan Morris, Jr. who said he wanted to count how many machines were connected to the Internet. 134  Rome Laboratory  edit  In 1994, over a hundred intrusions were made by unidentified crackers into the Rome Laboratory , the US Air Forces main command and research facility. Using trojan horses , hackers were able to obtain unrestricted access to Romes networking systems and remove traces of their activities. The intruders were able to obtain classified files, such as air tasking order systems data and furthermore able to penetrate connected networks of National Aeronautics and Space Administration s Goddard Space Flight Center, Wright-Patterson Air Force Base, some Defense contractors, and other private sector organizations, by posing as a trusted Rome center user. 135  TJX customer credit card details  edit  In early 2007, American apparel and home goods company TJX announced that it was the victim of an unauthorized computer systems intrusion 136  and that the hackers had accessed a system that stored data on credit card , debit card , check , and merchandise return transactions. 137  Stuxnet attack  edit  In 2010 the computer worm known as Stuxnet reportedly ruined almost one-fifth of Irans nuclear centrifuges . 138  It did so by disrupting industrial programmable logic controllers PLCs in a targeted attack. This is generally believed to have been launched by Israel and the United States 139  140  141  142   although neither has publicly admitted this. Global surveillance disclosures  edit  Main article Global surveillance disclosures 2013present In early 2013, documents provided by Edward Snowden were published by The Washington Post and The Guardian 143  144  exposing the massive scale of NSA global surveillance. There were also indications that the NSA may have inserted a backdoor in a NIST standard for encryption. 145  This standard was later withdrawn due to widespread criticism. 146  The NSA additionally were revealed to have tapped the links between Google s data centres. 147  Target and Home Depot breaches  edit  In 2013 and 2014, a Russian  Ukrainian hacking ring known as Rescator broke into Target Corporation computers in 2013, stealing roughly 40 million credit cards, 148  and then Home Depot computers in 2014, stealing between 53 and 56 million credit card numbers. 149  Warnings were delivered at both corporations, but ignored physical security breaches using self checkout machines are believed to have played a large role. The malware utilized is absolutely unsophisticated and uninteresting, says Jim Walter, director of threat intelligence operations at security technology company McAfee  meaning that the heists could have easily been stopped by existing antivirus software had administrators responded to the warnings. The size of the thefts has resulted in major attention from state and Federal United States authorities and the investigation is ongoing. Office of Personnel Management data breach  edit  In April 2015, the Office of Personnel Management discovered it had been hacked more than a year earlier in a data breach, resulting in the theft of approximately 21.5 million personnel records handled by the office. 150  The Office of Personnel Management hack has been described by federal officials as among the largest breaches of government data in the history of the United States. 151  Data targeted in the breach included personally identifiable information such as Social Security Numbers , names, dates and places of birth, addresses, and fingerprints of current and former government employees as well as anyone who had undergone a government background check. 152  153  It is believed the hack was perpetrated by Chinese hackers. 154  Ashley Madison breach  edit  Main article Ashley Madison Data Breach In July 2015, a hacker group known as The Impact Team successfully breached the extramarital relationship website Ashley Madison, created by Avid Life Media . The group claimed that they had taken not only company data but user data as well. After the breach, The Impact Team dumped emails from the companys CEO, to prove their point, and threatened to dump customer data unless the website was taken down permanently. 155  When Avid Life Media did not take the site offline the group released two more compressed files, one 9.7GB and the second 20GB. After the second data dump, Avid Life Media CEO Noel Biderman resigned but the website remained functioning. Legal issues and global regulation  edit  International legal issues of cyber attacks are complicated in nature. There is no global base of common rules to judge, and eventually punish, cyber crimes and cyber criminals - and where security firms or agencies do locate the cybercriminal behind the creation of a particular piece of malware or form of cyber attack , often the local authorities cannot take action due to lack of laws under which to prosecute. 156  157  Proving attribution for cyber crimes and cyber attacks is also a major problem for all law enforcement agencies.  Computer viruses switch from one country to another, from one jurisdiction to another  moving around the world, using the fact that we dont have the capability to globally police operations like this. So the Internet is as if someone had given free plane tickets to all the online criminals of the world. 156  The use of techniques such as dynamic DNS , fast flux and bullet proof servers add to the difficulty of investigation and enforcement. Role of government  edit  The role of the government is to make regulations to force companies and organizations to protect their systems, infrastructure and information from any cyberattacks , but also to protect its own national infrastructure such as the national power-grid . 158  Governments regulatory role in cyberspace is complicated. For some, cyberspace was seen virtual space that was to remain free of government intervention, as can be seen in many of todays libertarian blockchain and bitcoin discussions. 159  Many government officials and experts think that the government should do more and that there is a crucial need for improved regulation, mainly due to the failure of the private sector to solve efficiently the cybersecurity problem. R. Clarke said during a panel discussion at the RSA Security Conference in San Francisco , he believes that the industry only responds when you threaten regulation. If the industry doesnt respond to the threat, you have to follow through. 160  On the other hand, executives from the private sector agree that improvements are necessary, but think that the government intervention would affect their ability to innovate efficiently. Daniel R. McCarthy analyzed this public-private partnership in cybersecurity and reflected on the role of cybersecurity in the broader constitution of political order. 161  International actions  edit  Many different teams and organisations exist, including The Forum of Incident Response and Security Teams FIRST is the global association of CSIRTs. 162  The US-CERT , AT T , Apple , Cisco , McAfee , Microsoft are all members of this international team. 163  The Council of Europe helps protect societies worldwide from the threat of cybercrime through the Convention on Cybercrime. 164  The purpose of the Messaging Anti-Abuse Working Group MAAWG is to bring the messaging industry together to work collaboratively and to successfully address the various forms of messaging abuse, such as spam, viruses, denial-of-service attacks and other messaging exploitations. 165  France Telecom , Facebook , AT T , Apple , Cisco , Sprint are some of the members of the MAAWG. 166  ENISA   The European Network and Information Security Agency ENISA is an agency of the European Union with the objective to improve network and information security in the European Union . Europe  edit  On 14 April 2016 the European Parliament and Council of the European Union adopted The General Data Protection Regulation GDPR EU 2016679. GDPR, which became enforceable beginning 25 May 2018, provides for data protection and privacy for all individuals within the European Union EU and the European Economic Area EEA. GDPR requires that business processes that handle personal data be built with data protection by design and by default. GDPR also requires that certain organizations appoint a Data Protection Officer DPO. National actions  edit  Computer emergency response teams  edit  Main article Computer emergency response team Most countries have their own computer emergency response team to protect network security. Canada  edit  Since 2010, Canada has had a Cyber Security Strategy. 167  168  168  This functions as a counterpart document to the National Strategy and Action Plan for Critical Infrastructure. 169  The strategy has three main pillars securing government systems, securing vital private cyber systems, and helping Canadians to be secure online. 168  169  There is also a Cyber Incident Management Framework to provide a coordinated response in the event of a cyber incident. 170  171  The Canadian Cyber Incident Response Centre CCIRC is responsible for mitigating and responding to threats to Canadas critical infrastructure and cyber systems. It provides support to mitigate cyber threats, technical support to respond and recover from targeted cyber attacks, and provides online tools for members of Canadas critical infrastructure sectors. 172  It posts regular cyber security bulletins 173  and operates an online reporting tool where individuals and organizations can report a cyber incident. 174  To inform the general public on how to protect themselves online, Public Safety Canada has partnered with STOP.THINK.CONNECT, a coalition of non-profit, private sector, and government organizations, 175  and launched the Cyber Security Cooperation Program. 176  177  They also run the GetCyberSafe portal for Canadian citizens, and Cyber Security Awareness Month during October. 178  Public Safety Canada aims to begin an evaluation of Canadas Cyber Security Strategy in early 2015. 169  China  edit  China s Central Leading Group for Internet Security and Informatization  Chinese    was established on 27 February 2014. This Leading Small Group LSG of the Communist Party of China is headed by General Secretary Xi Jinping himself and is staffed with relevant Party and state decision-makers. The LSG was created to overcome the incoherent policies and overlapping responsibilities that characterized Chinas former cyberspace decision-making mechanisms. The LSG oversees policy-making in the economic, political, cultural, social and military fields as they relate to network security and IT strategy. This LSG also coordinates major policy initiatives in the international arena that promote norms and standards favored by the Chinese government and that emphasize the principle of national sovereignty in cyberspace. 179  Germany  edit  Berlin starts National Cyber Defense Initiative On 16 June 2011, the German Minister for Home Affairs, officially opened the new German NCAZ National Center for Cyber Defense Nationales Cyber-Abwehrzentrum located in Bonn. The NCAZ closely cooperates with BSI Federal Office for Information Security Bundesamt fr Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik , BKA Federal Police Organisation Bundeskriminalamt Deutschland , BND Federal Intelligence Service Bundesnachrichtendienst , MAD Military Intelligence Service Amt fr den Militrischen Abschirmdienst and other national organisations in Germany taking care of national security aspects. According to the Minister the primary task of the new organization founded on 23 February 2011, is to detect and prevent attacks against the national infrastructure and mentioned incidents like Stuxnet . India  edit  Some provisions for cyber security have been incorporated into rules framed under the Information Technology Act 2000. 180  The National Cyber Security Policy 2013 is a policy framework by Ministry of Electronics and Information Technology MeitY which aims to protect the public and private infrastructure from cyber attacks, and safeguard information, such as personal information of web users, financial and banking information and sovereign data. CERT- In is the nodal agency which monitors the cyber threats in the country. The post of National Cyber Security Coordinator has also been created in the Prime Ministers Office PMO . The Indian Companies Act 2013 has also introduced cyber law and cyber security obligations on the part of Indian directors. Some provisions for cyber security have been incorporated into rules framed under the Information Technology Act 2000 Update in 2013. 181  South Korea  edit  Following cyber attacks in the first half of 2013, when the government, news media, television station, and bank websites were compromised, the national government committed to the training of 5,000 new cybersecurity experts by 2017. The South Korean government blamed its northern counterpart for these attacks, as well as incidents that occurred in 2009, 2011, 182  and 2012, but Pyongyang denies the accusations. 183  United States  edit  Legislation  edit  The 1986 18 U.S.C.     1030 , the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act is the key legislation. It prohibits unauthorized access or damage of protected computers as defined in 18 U.S.C.     1030e2 . Although various other measures have been proposed 184  185   none has succeeded. In 2013, executive order 13636 Improving Critical Infrastructure Cybersecurity was signed, which prompted the creation of the NIST Cybersecurity Framework Standardized Government Testing Services The General Services Administration GSA has standardized the penetration test service as a pre-vetted support service, to rapidly address potential vulnerabilities, and stop adversaries before they impact US federal, state and local governments. These services are commonly referred to as Highly Adaptive Cybersecurity Services HACS and are listed at the US GSA Advantage website. See more information here Penetration test Standardized government penetration test services . Agencies  edit  The Department of Homeland Security has a dedicated division responsible for the response system, risk management program and requirements for cybersecurity in the United States called the National Cyber Security Division . 186  187  The division is home to US-CERT operations and the National Cyber Alert System. 187  The National Cybersecurity and Communications Integration Center brings together government organizations responsible for protecting computer networks and networked infrastructure. 188  The third priority of the Federal Bureau of Investigation FBI is to Protect the United States against cyber-based attacks and high-technology crimes, 189  and they, along with the National White Collar Crime Center NW3C, and the Bureau of Justice Assistance BJA are part of the multi-agency task force, The Internet Crime Complaint Center , also known as IC3. 190  In addition to its own specific duties, the FBI participates alongside non-profit organizations such as InfraGard . 191  192  In the criminal division of the United States Department of Justice operates a section called the Computer Crime and Intellectual Property Section . The CCIPS is in charge of investigating computer crime and intellectual property crime and is specialized in the search and seizure of digital evidence in computers and networks . 193  In 2017, CCIPS published A Framework for a Vulnerability Disclosure Program for Online Systems to help organizations clearly describe authorized vulnerability disclosure and discovery conduct, thereby substantially reducing the likelihood that such described activities will result in a civil or criminal violation of law under the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act 18 U.S.C.  1030 . 194  The United States Cyber Command , also known as USCYBERCOM, is tasked with the defense of specified Department of Defense information networks and ensures the security, integrity, and governance of government and military IT infrastructure and assets. 195  It has no role in the protection of civilian networks. 196  197  The U.S. Federal Communications Commission s role in cybersecurity is to strengthen the protection of critical communications infrastructure, to assist in maintaining the reliability of networks during disasters, to aid in swift recovery after, and to ensure that first responders have access to effective communications services. 198  The Food and Drug Administration has issued guidance for medical devices, 199  and the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration 200  is concerned with automotive cybersecurity. After being criticized by the Government Accountability Office , 201  and following successful attacks on airports and claimed attacks on airplanes, the Federal Aviation Administration has devoted funding to securing systems on board the planes of private manufacturers, and the Aircraft Communications Addressing and Reporting System . 202  Concerns have also been raised about the future Next Generation Air Transportation System . 203  Computer emergency readiness team  edit   Computer emergency response team  is a name given to expert groups that handle computer security incidents. In the US, two distinct organization exist, although they do work closely together. US-CERT  part of the National Cyber Security Division of the United States Department of Homeland Security . 204  CERTCC  created by the Defense Advanced Research Projects Agency DARPA and run by the Software Engineering Institute SEI. Modern warfare  edit  Main article Cyberwarfare There is growing concern that cyberspace will become the next theater of warfare. As Mark Clayton from the Christian Science Monitor described in an article titled The New Cyber Arms Race In the future, wars will not just be fought by soldiers with guns or with planes that drop bombs. They will also be fought with the click of a mouse a half a world away that unleashes carefully weaponized computer programs that disrupt or destroy critical industries like utilities, transportation, communications, and energy. Such attacks could also disable military networks tha t control the movement of troops, the path of jet fighters, the command and control of warships. 205  This has led to new terms such as cyberwarfare and cyberterrorism . The United States Cyber Command was created in 2009 206  and many other countries have similar forces . There are a few critical voices that question whether cybersecurity is as significant a threat as it is made out to be. 207  208  209  Careers  edit  Cybersecurity is a fast-growing field of IT concerned with reducing organizations risk of hack or data breach. 210  According to research from the Enterprise Strategy Group, 46 of organizations say that they have a problematic shortage of cybersecurity skills in 2016, up from 28 in 2015. 211  Commercial, government and non-governmental organizations all employ cybersecurity professionals. The fastest increases in demand for cybersecurity workers are in industries managing increasing volumes of consumer data such as finance, health care, and retail. 212  However, the use of the term cybersecurity is more prevalent in government job descriptions. 213  Typical cyber security job titles and descriptions include 214  Security analyst  edit  Analyzes and assesses vulnerabilities in the infrastructure software, hardware, networks, investigates using available tools and countermeasures to remedy the detected vulnerabilities, and recommends solutions and best practices. Analyzes and assesses damage to the datainfrastructure as a result of security incidents, examines available recovery tools and processes, and reco mmends solutions. Tests for compliance with security policies and procedures. May assist in the creation, implementation, or management of security solutions. Security engineer  edit  Performs security monitoring, security and datalogs analysis, and forensic analysis, to detect security incidents, and mounts the incident response. Investigates and utilizes new technologies and processes to enhance security capabilities and implement improvements. May also review code or perform other security engineering methodologies. Security architect  edit  Designs a security system or major components of a security system, and may head a security design team building a new security system. Security administrator  edit  Installs and manages organization-wide security systems. This position may also include taking on some of the tasks of a security analyst in smaller organizations. Chief Information Security Officer CISO  edit  A high-level management position responsible for the entire information security divisionstaff. The position may include hands-on technical work. Chief Security Officer CSO  edit  A high-level management position responsible for the entire security divisionstaff. A newer position now deemed needed as security risks grow. Security ConsultantSpecialistIntelligence  edit  Broad titles that encompass any one or all of the other roles or titles tasked with protecting computers, networks, software, data or information systems against viruses, worms, spyware, malware, intrusion detection, unauthorized access, denial-of-service attacks, and an ever increasing list of attacks by hackers acting as individuals or as part of organized crime or foreign go vernments. Student programs are also available to people interested in beginning a career in cybersecurity. 215  216  Meanwhile, a flexible and effective option for information security professionals of all experience levels to keep studying is online security training, including webcasts. 217  218  219  A wide range of certified courses are also available. 220  In the United Kingdom , a nationwide set of cyber security forums, known as the U.K Cyber Security Forum , were established supported by the Governments cyber security strategy 221  in order to encourage start-ups and innovation and to address the skills gap 222  identified by the U.K Government . Terminology  edit  The following terms used with regards to computer security are explained below Access authorization restricts access to a computer to a group of users through the use of authentication systems. These systems can protect either the whole computer, such as through an interactive login screen, or individual services, such as a FTP server. There are many methods for identifying and authenticating users, such as passwords , identification cards , smart cards , and biometric systems. Anti-virus software consists of computer programs that attempt to identify, thwart, and eliminate computer viruses and other malicious software  malware . Applications are executable code , so general practice is to disallow users the power to install them to install only those which are known to be reputable  and to reduce the attack surface by installing as few as possible. They are typically run with least privilege , with a robust process in place to identify, test and install any released security patches or updates for them. Authentication techniques can be used to ensure that communication end-points are who they say they are. Automated theorem proving and other verification tools can enable critical algorithms and code used in secure systems to be mathematically proven to meet their specifications. Backups are one or more copies kept of important computer files. Typically, multiple copies will be kept at different locations so that if a copy is stolen or damaged, other copies will still exist. Capability and access control list techniques can be used to ensure privilege separation and mandatory access control. Capabilities vs. ACLs discusses their use. Chain of trust techniques can be used to attempt to ensure that all software loaded has been certified as authentic by the systems designers. Confidentiality is the nondisclosure of information except to another authorized person. 223  Cryptographic techniques can be used to defend data in transit between systems, reducing the probability that data exchanged between systems can be intercepted or modified. Cyberwarfare is an Internet-based conflict that involves politically motivated attacks on information and information systems. Such attacks can, for example, disable official websites and networks, disrupt or disable essential services, steal or alter classified data, and cripple financial systems. Data integrity is the accuracy and consistency of stored data, indicated by an absence of any alteration in data between two updates of a data record. 224  Cryptographic techniques involve transforming information, scrambling it, so it becomes unreadable during transmission. The intended recipient can unscramble the message ideally, eavesdroppers cannot. Encryption is used to protect the confidentiality of a message. Cryptographically secure ciphers are designed to make any practical attempt of breaking them infeasible. Symmetric-key ciphers are suitable for bulk encryption using shared keys , and public-key encryption using digital certificates can provide a practical solution for the problem of securely communicating when no key is shared in advance. Endpoint security software aids networks in preventing malware infection and data theft at network entry points made vulnerable by the prevalence of potentially infected devices such as laptops, mobile devices, and USB drives. 225  Firewalls serve as a gatekeeper system between networks, allowing only traffic that matches defined rules. They often include detailed logging , and may include intrusion detection and intrusion prevention features. They are near-universal between company local area networks and the Internet, but can also be used internally to impose traffic rules between networks if network segmentation is configured. A hacker is someone who seeks to breach defenses and exploit weaknesses in a computer system or network. Honey pots are computers that are intentionally left vulnerable to attack by crackers. They can be used to catch crackers and to identify their techniques. Intrusion-detection systems are devices or software applications that monitor networks or systems for malicious activity or policy violations. A microkernel is an approach to operating system design which has only the near-minimum amount of code running at the most privileged level  and runs other elements of the operating system such as device drivers, protocol stacks and file systems, in the safer, less privileged user space . Pinging . The standard ping application can be used to test if an IP address is in use. If it is, attackers may then try a port scan to detect which services are exposed. A port scan is used to probe an IP address for open ports to identify accessible network services and applications. A Key logger is spyware silently captures and stores each keystroke that a user types on the computers keyboard. Social engineering is the use of deception to manipulate individuals to breach security. Logic bombs is a type of malware added to a legitimate program that lies dormant until it is triggered by a specific event. Scholars  edit  Ross J. Anderson Annie Anton Adam Back Daniel J. Bernstein Matt Blaze Stefan Brands L. Jean Camp Lance Cottrell Lorrie Cranor Dorothy E. Denning Peter J. Denning Cynthia Dwork Chuck Easttom Deborah Estrin Joan Feigenbaum Ian Goldberg Shafi Goldwasser Lawrence A. Gordon Peter Gutmann Paul Kocher Monica S. Lam Butler Lampson Brian LaMacchia Carl Landwehr Kevin Mitnick Peter G. Neumann Susan Nycum Roger R. Schell Bruce Schneier Dawn Song Gene Spafford Salvatore J. Stolfo Willis Ware Moti Yung See also  edit  Attack tree Bicycle attack CAPTCHA Cloud computing security Common Criteria Comparison of antivirus software Computer security model Content Disarm  Reconstruction Content security Countermeasure computer Cybercrime Cybersecurity information technology list Cyber-Insurance Cyber security standards Cyber self-defense Dancing pigs Data security Disk encryption Exploit computer security Fault tolerance Hardware security Humancomputer interaction security Identity management Identity theft Identity-based security Information security awareness Internet privacy Internet security IT risk Kill chain Keylogging List of computer security certifications Open security Outline of computer security OWASP Penetration test Physical information security Privacy software Proactive cyber defence Ransomware Sandbox computer security Separation of protection and security Software Defined Perimeter References  edit   Schatz, Daniel Bashroush, Rabih Wall, Julie 2017. Towards a More Representative Definition of Cyber Security . Journal of Digital Forensics, Security and Law . 12 2. ISSN   1558-7215 . .mw-parser-output cite.citationfont-styleinherit.mw-parser-output .citation qquotes.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-free abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumb665Lock-green.svg9px-Lock-green.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em center.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-limited a,.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-registration abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumbdd6Lock-gray-alt-2.svg9px-Lock-gray-alt-2.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em center.mw-parser-output .citation .cs1-lock-subscription abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumbaaaLock-red-alt-2.svg9px-Lock-red-alt-2.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em ce nter.mw-parser-output .cs1-subscription,.mw-parser-output .cs1-registrationcolor555.mw-parser-output .cs1-subscription span,.mw-parser-output .cs1-registration spanborder-bottom1px dottedcursorhelp.mw-parser-output .cs1-ws-icon abackgroundurlupload.wikimedia.orgwikipediacommonsthumb44cWikisource-logo.svg12px-Wikisource-logo.svg.pngno-repeatbackground-positionright .1em center.mw-parser-output code.cs1-codecolorinheritbackgroundinheritborderinheritpaddinginherit.mw-parser-output .cs1-hidden-errordisplaynonefont-size100.mw-parser-output .cs1-visible-errorfont-size100.mw-parser-output .cs1-maintdisplaynonecolor33aa33margin-left0.3em.mw-parser-output .cs1-subscription,.mw-parser-output .cs1-registration,.mw-parser-outpu t .cs1-formatfont-size95.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-left,.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-wl-leftpadding-left0.2em.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-right,.mw-parser-output .cs1-kern-wl-rightpadding-right0.2em  Reliance spells end of road for ICT amateurs , 7 May 2013, The Australian  Stevens, Tim 11 June 2018. Global Cybersecurity New Directions in Theory and Methods PDF . Politics and Governance . 6 2 14. doi  10.17645pag.v6i2.1569 .  Computer Security and Mobile Security Challenges . researchgate.net . 3 December 2015. Archived from the original on 12 October 2016 . Retrieved 4 August 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Distributed Denial of Service Attack . csa.gov.sg . Archived from the original on 6 August 2016 . Retrieved 12 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Wireless mouse leave billions at risk of computer hack cyber security firm Archived 3 April 2016 at the Wayback Machine  Multi-Vector Attacks Demand Multi-Vector Protection . MSSP Alert . 24 July 2018.  Millman, Renee 15 December 2017. New polymorphic malware evades three quarters of AV scanners . SC Magazine UK .  Turner, Rik 22 May 2018. Thinking about cyberattacks in generations can help focus enterprise security plans . Informa PLC . Ovum.  Identifying Phishing Attempts . Case. Archived from the original on 13 September 2015 . Retrieved 4 July 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Arcos Sergio. Social Engineering PDF . Archived PDF from the original on 3 December 2013. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Scannell, Kara 24 February 2016. CEO email scam costs companies 2bn . Financial Times 25 Feb 2016. Archived from the original on 23 June 2016 . Retrieved 7 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Bucks leak tax info of players, employees as result of email scam . Associated Press. 20 May 2016. Archived from the original on 20 May 2016 . Retrieved 20 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   What is Spoofing  Definition from Techopedia . Archived from the original on 30 June 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   spoofing . Oxford Reference . Oxford University Press. 21 January 2016. doi  10.1093acref9780199688975.001.0001 . ISBN   9780199688975 . Retrieved 8 October 2017 .  Marcel, Sbastien Nixon, Mark Li, Stan, eds. 2014. Handbook of Biometric Anti-Spoofing Trusted Biometrics under Spoofing Attacks . Advances in Computer Vision and Pattern Recognition. London Springer. doi  10.1007978-1-4471-6524-8 . ISBN   978-1-4471-6524-8 . ISSN   2191-6594 . LCCN   2014942635 .  Gallagher, Sean 14 May 2014. Photos of an NSA upgrade factory show Cisco router getting implant . Ars Technica . Archived from the original on 4 August 2014 . Retrieved 3 August 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Lim, Joo S., et al. Exploring the Relationship between Organizational Culture and Information Security Culture. Australian Information Security Management Conference.  K. Reimers, D. Andersson 2017 POST-SECONDARY EDUCATION NETWORK SECURITY THE END USER CHALLENGE AND EVOLVING THREATS , ICERI2017 Proceedings, pp. 1787-1796.  a b c Schlienger, Thomas Teufel, Stephanie 2003. Information security culture-from analysis to change. South African Computer Journal . 31  4652.  Lin, Tom C. W. 3 July 2017. The New Market Manipulation. Emory Law Journal . 66  1253. SSRN   2996896 .  Financial Weapons of War. Minnesota Law Review . 2016. SSRN   2765010 .  Pagliery, Jose 18 November 2014. Hackers attacked the U.S. energy grid 79 times this year . CNN Money . Cable News Network. Archived from the original on 18 February 2015 . Retrieved 16 April 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Vulnerabilities in Smart Meters and the C12.12 Protocol . SecureState. 16 February 2012. Archived from the original on 17 October 2016 . Retrieved 4 November 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   P. G. Neumann, Computer Security in Aviation, presented at International Conference on Aviation Safety and Security in the 21st Century, White House Commission on Safety and Security, 1997.  J. Zellan, Aviation Security. Hauppauge, NY Nova Science, 2003, pp. 6570.  Air Traffic Control Systems Vulnerabilities Could Make for Unfriendly Skies Black Hat  - SecurityWeek.Com . Archived from the original on 8 February 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Hacker Says He Can Break Into Airplane Systems Using In-Flight Wi-Fi . NPR.org . 4 August 2014. Archived from the original on 8 February 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Jim Finkle 4 August 2014. Hacker says to show passenger jets at risk of cyber attack . Reuters . Archived from the original on 13 October 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Pan-European Network Services PENS - Eurocontrol.int . Archived from the original on 12 December 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Centralised Services NewPENS moves forward - Eurocontrol.int . 17 January 2016. Archived from the original on 19 March 2017. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   NextGen Data Communication . FAA. Archived from the original on 13 March 2015 . Retrieved 15 June 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b Is Your Watch Or Thermostat A Spy Cybersecurity Firms Are On It . NPR.org . 6 August 2014. Archived from the original on 11 February 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Melvin Backman 18 September 2014. Home Depot 56 million cards exposed in breach . CNNMoney . Archived from the original on 18 December 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Staples Breach may have affected 1.16 million customers cards . Fortune.com . 19 December 2014. Archived from the original on 21 December 2014 . Retrieved 21 December 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   CNNMoney Staff 19 December 2013. Target 40 million credit cards compromised . CNN . Archived from the original on 1 December 2017 . Retrieved 29 November 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cowley, Stacy 2 October 2017. 2.5 Million More People Potentially Exposed in Equifax Breach . The New York Times . Archived from the original on 1 December 2017 . Retrieved 29 November 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Wakabayashi, Daisuke Shane, Scott 27 September 2017. Twitter, With Accounts Linked to Russia, to Face Congress Over Role in Election . The New York Times . Archived from the original on 2 November 2017 . Retrieved 29 November 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Jim Finkle 23 April 2014. Exclusive FBI warns healthcare sector vulnerable to cyber attacks . Reuters . Archived from the original on 4 June 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b Cybersecurity Programs of the Future What Will Bench Strength Look Like . www.secureworks.com . Archived from the original on 5 January 2018 . Retrieved 12 October 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Seals, Tara 6 November 2015. Lack of Employee Security Training Plagues US Businesses . Infosecurity Magazine . Archived from the original on 9 November 2017 . Retrieved 8 November 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Bright, Peter 15 February 2011. Anonymous speaks the inside story of the HBGary hack . Arstechnica.com. Archived from the original on 27 March 2011 . Retrieved 29 March 2011 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Anderson, Nate 9 February 2011. How one man tracked down Anonymousand paid a heavy price . Arstechnica.com. Archived from the original on 29 March 2011 . Retrieved 29 March 2011 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Palilery, Jose 24 December 2014. What caused Sony hack What we know now . CNN Money . Archived from the original on 4 January 2015 . Retrieved 4 January 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   James Cook 16 December 2014. Sony Hackers Have Over 100 Terabytes Of Documents. Only Released 200 Gigabytes So Far . Business Insider . Archived from the original on 17 December 2014 . Retrieved 18 December 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b Timothy B. Lee 18 January 2015. The next frontier of hacking your car . Vox . Archived from the original on 17 March 2017. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Tracking  Hacking Security  Privacy Gaps Put American Drivers at Risk PDF Report. 6 February 2015. Archived PDF from the original on 9 November 2016 . Retrieved 4 November 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Staff, AOL. Cybersecurity expert It will take a major event for companies to take this issue seriously . AOL.com . Archived from the original on 20 January 2017 . Retrieved 22 January 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   The problem with self-driving cars who controls the code . The Guardian . 23 December 2015. Archived from the original on 16 March 2017 . Retrieved 22 January 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Stephen Checkoway Damon McCoy Brian Kantor  Danny Anderson Hovav Shacham Stefan Savage  Karl Koscher Alexei Czeskis Franziska Roesner Tadayoshi Kohno 2011. Comprehensive Experimental Analyses of Automotive Attack Surfaces PDF . SEC11 Proceedings of the 20th USENIX conference on Security. Berkeley, CA, US USENIX Association. p.  6. Archived PDF from the original on 21 February 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Greenberg, Andy 21 July 2015. Hackers Remotely Kill a Jeep on the HighwayWith Me in It . Wired . Archived from the original on 19 January 2017 . Retrieved 22 January 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Hackers take control of car, drive it into a ditch . The Independent . 22 July 2015. Archived from the original on 2 February 2017 . Retrieved 22 January 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Staff, Our Foreign 21 September 2016. Tesla fixes software bug that allowed Chinese hackers to control car remotely . The Telegraph . Archived from the original on 2 February 2017 . Retrieved 22 January 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Kang, Cecilia 19 September 2016. Self-Driving Cars Gain Powerful Ally The Government . The New York Times . Archived from the original on 14 February 2017 . Retrieved 22 January 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Federal Automated Vehicles Policy PDF . Archived PDF from the original on 21 January 2017 . Retrieved 22 January 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Internet strikes back Anonymous Operation Megaupload explained . RT . 20 January 2012. Archived from the original on 25 April 2013 . Retrieved 5 May 2013 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Gary McKinnon profile Autistic hacker who started writing computer programs at 14 . The Daily Telegraph . London. 23 January 2009. Archived from the original on 2 June 2010. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Gary McKinnon extradition ruling due by 16 October . BBC News . 6 September 2012. Archived from the original on 6 September 2012 . Retrieved 25 September 2012 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Law Lords Department 30 July 2008. House of Lords  Mckinnon V Government of The United States of America and Another . Publications.parliament.uk. Archived from the original on 7 March 2009 . Retrieved 30 January 2010 . 15.  alleged to total over 700,000 Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   NSA Accessed Mexican Presidents Email Archived 6 November 2015 at the Wayback Machine , 20 October 2013, Jens Glsing, Laura Poitras, Marcel Rosenbach and Holger Stark, spiegel.de  Sanders, Sam 4 June 2015. Massive Data Breach Puts 4 Million Federal Employees Records At Risk . NPR . Archived from the original on 5 June 2015 . Retrieved 5 June 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Liptak, Kevin 4 June 2015. U.S. government hacked feds think China is the culprit . CNN . Archived from the original on 6 June 2015 . Retrieved 5 June 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Sean Gallagher. Encryption would not have helped at OPM, says DHS official . Archived from the original on 24 June 2017. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Schools Learn Lessons From Security Breaches . Education Week . 19 October 2015. Archived from the original on 10 June 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Internet of Things Global Standards Initiative . ITU . Archived from the original on 26 June 2015 . Retrieved 26 June 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Singh, Jatinder Pasquier, Thomas Bacon, Jean Ko, Hajoon Eyers, David 2015. Twenty Cloud Security Considerations for Supporting the Internet of Things . IEEE Internet of Things Journal . 3 3 269284. doi  10.1109JIOT.2015.2460333 .  Chris Clearfield. Why The FTC Cant Regulate The Internet Of Things . Forbes . Archived from the original on 27 June 2015 . Retrieved 26 June 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Internet of Things Science Fiction or Business Fact PDF . Harvard Business Review . Retrieved 4 November 2016 .  Ovidiu Vermesan Peter Friess. Internet of Things Converging Technologies for Smart Environments and Integrated Ecosystems PDF . River Publishers. Archived PDF from the original on 12 October 2016 . Retrieved 4 November 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Christopher Clearfield Rethinking Security for the Internet of Things Harvard Business Review Blog, 26 June 2013 Archived 20 September 2013 at the Wayback Machine   Hotel room burglars exploit critical flaw in electronic door locks . Ars Technica . 26 November 2012. Archived from the original on 14 May 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Hospital Medical Devices Used As Weapons In Cyberattacks . Dark Reading . Archived from the original on 29 May 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Jeremy Kirk 17 October 2012. Pacemaker hack can deliver deadly 830-volt jolt . Computerworld . Archived from the original on 4 June 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   News, Kaiser Health 17 November 2014. How Your Pacemaker Will Get Hacked . The Daily Beast . Archived from the original on 20 May 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Leetaru, Kalev. Hacking Hospitals And Holding Hostages Cybersecurity In 2016 . Forbes . Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b Cyber-Angriffe Krankenhuser rcken ins Visier der Hacker . Wirtschafts Woche. Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Hospitals keep getting attacked by ransomwareHeres why . Business Insider . Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   MedStar Hospitals Recovering After Ransomware Hack . NBC News. Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Pauli, Darren. US hospitals hacked with ancient exploits . The Register . Archived from the original on 16 November 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Pauli, Darren. Zombie OS lurches through Royal Melbourne Hospital spreading virus . The Register . Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Hacked Lincolnshire hospital computer systems back up   . BBC News . 2 November 2016. Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Lincolnshire operations cancelled after network attack . BBC News . 31 October 2016. Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Legion cyber-attack Next dump is sansad.nic.in, say hackers . The Indian Express . 12 December 2016. Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   15k patients info shared on social media from NH Hospital data breach . RT International. Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Former New Hampshire Psychiatric Hospital Patient Accused Of Data Breach . CBS Boston. 27 December 2016. Archived from the original on 29 September 2017 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Texas Hospital hacked, affects nearly 30,000 patient records . Healthcare IT News. 4 November 2016. Archived from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Becker, Rachel 27 December 2016. New cybersecurity guidelines for medical devices tackle evolving threats . The Verge . Archived from the original on 28 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Postmarket Management of Cybersecurity in Medical Devices PDF . 28 December 2016. Archived PDF from the original on 29 December 2016 . Retrieved 29 December 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Brandt, Jaclyn 18 June 2018. D.C. distributed energy proposal draws concerns of increased cybersecurity risks . Daily Energy Insider . Retrieved 4 July 2018 .  Cashell, B., Jackson, W. D., Jickling, M.,  Webel, B. 2004. The Economic Impact of Cyber-Attacks. Congressional Research Service, Government and Finance Division. Washington DC The Library of Congress.  Gordon, Lawrence Loeb, Martin November 2002. The Economics of Information Security Investment. ACM Transactions on Information and System Security . 5 4 438457. doi  10.1145581271.581274 .  Chermick, Steven Freilich, Joshua Holt, Thomas April 2017. Exploring the Subculture of Ideologically Motivated Cyber-Attackers. Journal of Contemporary Criminal Justice . 33 3 212233. doi  10.11771043986217699100 .  RFC   2828 Internet Security Glossary  CNSS Instruction No. 4009 Archived 27 February 2012 at the Wayback Machine dated 26 April 2010  InfosecToday Glossary PDF . Archived PDF from the original on 20 November 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Definitions IT Security Architecture Archived 15 March 2014 at the Wayback Machine . SecurityArchitecture.org, Jan, 2006  Jannsen, Cory. Security Architecture . Techopedia . Janalta Interactive Inc. Archived from the original on 3 October 2014 . Retrieved 9 October 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cybersecurity at petabyte scale . Archived from the original on 13 July 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Woodie, Alex 9 May 2016. Why ONI May Be Our Best Hope for Cyber Security Now . Archived from the original on 20 August 2016 . Retrieved 13 July 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Firms lose more to electronic than physical theft . Reuters . 18 October 2010. Archived from the original on 25 September 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Foreman, P Vulnerability Management , page 1. Taylor  Francis Group, 2010. ISBN   978-1-4398-0150-5  Anna-Maija Juuso and Ari Takanen Unknown Vulnerability Management , Codenomicon whitepaper, October 2010 Defensics Fuzz Testing Find Hidden Vulnerabilities  Synopsys . Archived from the original on 27 February 2011 . Retrieved 22 February 2011 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Alan Calder and Geraint Williams 2014. PCI DSS A Pocket Guide, 3rd Edition . ISBN   978-1-84928-554-4 . network vulnerability scans at least quarterly and after any significant change in the network  Harrison, J. 2003. Formal verification at Intel . 18th Annual IEEE Symposium of Logic in Computer Science, 2003. Proceedings . pp.  4554. doi  10.1109LICS.2003.1210044 . ISBN   978-0-7695-1884-8 .  Umrigar, Zerksis D. Pitchumani, Vijay 1983. Formal verification of a real-time hardware design . Proceeding DAC 83 Proceedings of the 20th Design Automation Conference . IEEE Press. pp.  2217. ISBN   978-0-8186-0026-5 .  Abstract Formal Specification of the seL4ARMv6 API PDF . Archived from the original PDF on 21 May 2015 . Retrieved 19 May 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Christoph Baumann, Bernhard Beckert, Holger Blasum, and Thorsten Bormer Ingredients of Operating System Correctness Lessons Learned in the Formal Verification of PikeOS Archived 19 July 2011 at the Wayback Machine  Getting it Right Archived 4 May 2013 at the Wayback Machine by Jack Ganssle  Treglia, J.,  Delia, M. 2017. Cyber Security Inoculation. Presented at NYS Cyber Security Conference, Empire State Plaza Convention Center, Albany, NY, 34 June.  Villasenor, John 2010. The Hacker in Your Hardware The Next Security Threat. Scientific American . 303 2 8288. Bibcode  2010SciAm.303b..82V . doi  10.1038scientificamerican0810-82 . PMID   20684377 .  Waksman, Adam Sethumadhavan, Simha 2010, Tamper Evident Microprocessors PDF , Proceedings of the IEEE Symposium on Security and Privacy , Oakland, California, archived PDF from the original on 21 September 2013 Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Sentinel HASP HL . E-Spin. Archived from the original on 20 March 2014 . Retrieved 20 March 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Token-based authentication . SafeNet.com. Archived from the original on 20 March 2014 . Retrieved 20 March 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Lock and protect your Windows PC . TheWindowsClub.com. 10 February 2010. Archived from the original on 20 March 2014 . Retrieved 20 March 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   James Greene 2012. Intel Trusted Execution Technology White Paper PDF . Intel Corporation. Archived PDF from the original on 11 June 2014 . Retrieved 18 December 2013 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   SafeNet ProtectDrive 8.4 . SCMagazine.com. 4 October 2008. Archived from the original on 20 March 2014 . Retrieved 20 March 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Secure Hard Drives Lock Down Your Data . PCMag.com. 11 May 2009. Archived from the original on 21 June 2017. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   NIST 800-124 httpswww.nist.govpublicationsguidelines-managing-security-mobile-devices-enterprise  Forget IDs, use your phone as credentials . Fox Business Network . 4 November 2013. Archived from the original on 20 March 2014 . Retrieved 20 March 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Lipner, Steve 2015. The Birth and Death of the Orange Book. IEEE Annals of the History of Computing . 37 2 1931. doi  10.1109MAHC.2015.27 .  Kelly Jackson Higgins 18 November 2008. Secure OS Gets Highest NSA Rating, Goes Commercial . Dark Reading. Archived from the original on 3 December 2013 . Retrieved 1 December 2013 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Board or bored Lockheed Martin gets into the COTS hardware biz . VITA Technologies Magazine. 10 December 2010. Archived from the original on 2 May 2012 . Retrieved 9 March 2012 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Sanghavi, Alok 21 May 2010. What is formal verification. EE Times_Asia .  Yuanzhong Xu, Alan M. Dunn, Owen S. Hofmann, Michael Z. Lee, Syed Akbar Mehdi, and Emmett Witchel 23 November 2014. Application-Defined Decentralized Access Control . Proceedings of the Usenix ... Annual Technical Conference. Usenix Technical Conference . 2014  395408. PMC   4241348 . PMID   25426493 . CS1 maint multiple names authors list  link   Studies prove once again that users are the weakest link in the security chain . CSO Online . 22 January 2014 . Retrieved 8 October 2018 .  The Role of Human Error in Successful Security Attacks . IBM Security Intelligence . 2 September 2014 . Retrieved 8 October 2018 .  90 of security incidents trace back to PEBKAC and ID10T errors . Computerworld . 15 April 2015 . Retrieved 8 October 2018 .  Protect your online banking with 2FA . NZ Bankers Association . Retrieved 7 September 2019 .  The Human Component of Cyber Risk . The Coruscan Project . Retrieved 8 October 2018 .  Caldwell, Tracey 12 February 2013. Risky business why security awareness is crucial for employees . The Guardian . Retrieved 8 October 2018 .  Developing a Security Culture . CPNI - Centre for the Protection of National Infrastructure .  Top 3 Leading Cybersecurity Countries . 7 July 2016.  a b Alsinawi, Baan. TalaTek Incident Response Services . TalaTek, LLC . Retrieved 12 November 2018 .  a b Jonathan Zittrain, The Future of The Internet, Penguin Books, 2008  Information Security Archived 6 March 2016 at the Wayback Machine . United States Department of Defense, 1986  THE TJX COMPANIES, INC. VICTIMIZED BY COMPUTER SYSTEMS INTRUSION PROVIDES INFORMATION TO HELP PROTECT CUSTOMERS Press release. The TJX Companies, Inc. 17 January 2007. Archived from the original on 27 September 2012 . Retrieved 12 December 2009 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Largest Customer Info Breach Grows Archived 28 September 2007 at the Wayback Machine . MyFox Twin Cities, 29 March 2007.  The Stuxnet Attack On Irans Nuclear Plant Was Far More Dangerous Than Previously Thought . Business Insider . 20 November 2013. Archived from the original on 9 May 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Reals, Tucker 24 September 2010. Stuxnet Worm a U.S. Cyber-Attack on Iran Nukes . CBS News. Archived from the original on 16 October 2013. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Kim Zetter 17 February 2011. Cyberwar Issues Likely to Be Addressed Only After a Catastrophe . Wired . Archived from the original on 18 February 2011 . Retrieved 18 February 2011 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Chris Carroll 18 October 2011. Cone of silence surrounds U.S. cyberwarfare . Stars and Stripes. Archived from the original on 7 March 2012 . Retrieved 30 October 2011 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   John Bumgarner 27 April 2010. Computers as Weapons of War PDF . IO Journal. Archived from the original PDF on 19 December 2011 . Retrieved 30 October 2011 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Greenwald, Glenn 6 June 2013. NSA collecting phone records of millions of Verizon customers daily . The Guardian . Archived from the original on 16 August 2013 . Retrieved 16 August 2013 . Exclusive Top secret court order requiring Verizon to hand over all call data shows scale of domestic surveillance under Obama Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Seipel, Hubert. Transcript ARD interview with Edward Snowden . La Foundation Courage . Archived from the original on 14 July 2014 . Retrieved 11 June 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Newman, Lily Hay 9 October 2013. Can You Trust NIST . IEEE Spectrum . Archived from the original on 1 February 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   NIST Removes Cryptography Algorithm from Random Number Generator Recommendations . National Institute of Standards and Technology . 21 April 2014.  New Snowden Leak NSA Tapped Google, Yahoo Data Centers Archived 9 July 2014 at the Wayback Machine , 31 Oct 2013, Lorenzo Franceschi-Bicchierai, mashable.com  Michael Riley Ben Elgin Dune Lawrence Carol Matlack. Target Missed Warnings in Epic Hack of Credit Card Data  Businessweek . Businessweek.com . Archived from the original on 27 January 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Home Depot says 53 million emails stolen . CNET . CBS Interactive. 6 November 2014. Archived from the original on 9 December 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Millions more Americans hit by government personnel data hack . Reuters . 9 July 2017. Archived from the original on 28 February 2017 . Retrieved 25 February 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Barrett, Devlin. U.S. Suspects Hackers in China Breached About four 4 Million Peoples Records, Officials Say . The Wall Street Journal . Archived from the original on 4 June 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Risen, Tom 5 June 2015. China Suspected in Theft of Federal Employee Records . US News  World Report . Archived from the original on 6 June 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter dead-url  help   Zengerle, Patricia 19 July 2015. Estimate of Americans hit by government personnel data hack skyrockets . Reuters . Archived from the original on 10 July 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Sanger, David 5 June 2015. Hacking Linked to China Exposes Millions of U.S. Workers . New York Times . Archived from the original on 5 June 2015. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Mansfield-Devine, Steve 1 September 2015. The Ashley Madison affair. Network Security . 2015 9 816. doi  10.1016S1353-48581530080-5 .  a b Mikko Hypponen Fighting viruses, defending the net . TED. Archived from the original on 16 January 2013. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Mikko Hypponen  Behind Enemy Lines . Hack In The Box Security Conference. Archived from the original on 25 November 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Ensuring the Security of Federal Information Systems and Cyber Critical Infrastructure and Protecting the Privacy of Personally Identifiable Information . Government Accountability Office. Archived from the original on 19 November 2015 . Retrieved 3 November 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   King, Georgia 23 May 2018. The Venn diagram between libertarians and crypto bros is so close its basically a circle . Quartz .  Kirby, Carrie 24 June 2011. Former White House aide backs some Net regulation  Clarke says government, industry deserve F in cyber security . The San Francisco Chronicle .  McCarthy, Daniel 11 June 2018. Privatizing Political Authority Cybersecurity, Public-Private Partnerships, and the Reproduction of Liberal Political Order. Politics and Governance . 6 2 512. doi  10.17645pag.v6i2.1335 .  FIRST Mission . FIRST . Retrieved 6 July 2018 .  FIRST Members . FIRST . Retrieved 6 July 2018 .  European council . Archived from the original on 3 December 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   MAAWG . Archived from the original on 23 September 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   MAAWG . Archived from the original on 17 October 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Government of Canada Launches Canadas Cyber Security Strategy . Market Wired . 3 October 2010. Archived from the original on 2 November 2014 . Retrieved 1 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b c Canadas Cyber Security Strategy . Public Safety Canada . Government of Canada. Archived from the original on 2 November 2014 . Retrieved 1 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b c Action Plan 20102015 for Canadas Cyber Security Strategy . Public Safety Canada . Government of Canada. Archived from the original on 2 November 2014 . Retrieved 3 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cyber Incident Management Framework For Canada . Public Safety Canada . Government of Canada. Archived from the original on 2 November 2014 . Retrieved 3 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Action Plan 20102015 for Canadas Cyber Security Strategy . Public Safety Canada . Government of Canada. Archived from the original on 2 November 2014 . Retrieved 1 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Canadian Cyber Incident Response Centre . Public Safety Canada . Archived from the original on 8 October 2014 . Retrieved 1 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cyber Security Bulletins . Public Safety Canada . Archived from the original on 8 October 2014 . Retrieved 1 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Report a Cyber Security Incident . Public Safety Canada . Government of Canada. Archived from the original on 11 November 2014 . Retrieved 3 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Government of Canada Launches Cyber Security Awareness Month With New Public Awareness Partnership . Market Wired . Government of Canada. 27 September 2012. Archived from the original on 3 November 2014 . Retrieved 3 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cyber Security Cooperation Program . Public Safety Canada . Archived from the original on 2 November 2014 . Retrieved 1 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cyber Security Cooperation Program . Public Safety Canada . 16 December 2015. Archived from the original on 2 November 2014. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   GetCyberSafe . Get Cyber Safe . Government of Canada. Archived from the original on 11 November 2014 . Retrieved 3 November 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   6.16 Internet security National IT independence and Chinas cyber policy, in Sebastian Heilmann , editor,  Archived copy . Archived from the original on 23 March 2017 . Retrieved 11 May 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help  CS1 maint archived copy as title  link  China s Political System  , Lanham, Boulder, New York, London Rowman  Littlefield Publishers 2017 ISBN   978-1442277342  Need for proper structure of PPPs to address specific cyberspace risks . Archived from the original on 13 November 2017. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   National Cyber Safety and Security StandardsNCSSS-Home . www.ncdrc.res.in .  South Korea seeks global support in cyber attack probe. BBC Monitoring Asia Pacific . 7 March 2011.  Kwanwoo Jun 23 September 2013. Seoul Puts a Price on Cyberdefense . Wall Street Journal . Dow Jones  Company, Inc. Archived from the original on 25 September 2013 . Retrieved 24 September 2013 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Text of H.R.4962 as Introduced in House International Cybercrime Reporting and Cooperation Act  U.S. Congress . OpenCongress. Archived from the original on 28 December 2010 . Retrieved 25 September 2013 . Cite uses deprecated parameter dead-url  help   1 Archived 20 January 2012 at the Wayback Machine  National Cyber Security Division . U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Archived from the original on 11 June 2008 . Retrieved 14 June 2008 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   a b FAQ Cyber Security R D Center . U.S. Department of Homeland Security S T Directorate. Archived from the original on 6 October 2008 . Retrieved 14 June 2008 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   AFP-JiJi, U.S. boots up cybersecurity center, 31 October 2009.  Federal Bureau of Investigation  Priorities . Federal Bureau of Investigation. Archived from the original on 11 July 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Internet Crime Complaint Center IC3  Home . Archived from the original on 20 November 2011. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Infragard, Official Site . Infragard . Archived from the original on 9 September 2010 . Retrieved 10 September 2010 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Robert S. Mueller, III  InfraGard Interview at the 2005 InfraGard Conference . Infragard Official Site  Media Room . Archived from the original on 17 June 2011 . Retrieved 9 December 2009 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   CCIPS . 25 March 2015. Archived from the original on 23 August 2006. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   A Framework for a Vulnerability Disclosure Program for Online Systems . Cybersecurity Unit, Computer Crime  Intellectual Property Section Criminal Division U.S. Department of Justice. July 2017 . Retrieved 9 July 2018 .  The History  Future of the U.S. Cyber Command . n2information.com . 4 December 2017. Archived from the original on 8 December 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Speech . Defense.gov. Archived from the original on 15 April 2010 . Retrieved 10 July 2010 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Shachtman, Noah. Militarys Cyber Commander Swears No Role in Civilian Networks Archived 6 November 2010 at the Wayback Machine , The Brookings Institution Archived 10 February 2006 at the Wayback Machine , 23 September 2010.  FCC Cybersecurity . FCC. Archived from the original on 27 May 2010. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cybersecurity for Medical Devices and Hospital Networks FDA Safety Communication . Archived from the original on 28 May 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Automotive Cybersecurity  National Highway Traffic Safety Administration NHTSA . Archived from the original on 25 May 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Office, U. S. Government Accountability 14 April 2015. U.S. GAO  Air Traffic Control FAA Needs a More Comprehensive Approach to Address Cybersecurity As Agency Transitions to NextGen GAO-15370. Archived from the original on 13 June 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help  Cite journal requires journal  help   Aliya Sternstein 4 March 2016. FAA Working on New Guidelines for Hack-Proof Planes . Nextgov . Archived from the original on 19 May 2016 . Retrieved 23 May 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Bart Elias 18 June 2015. Protecting Civil Aviation from Cyberattacks PDF . Archived PDF from the original on 17 October 2016 . Retrieved 4 November 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Verton, Dan 28 January 2004. DHS launches national cyber alert system . Computerworld . IDG. Archived from the original on 31 August 2005 . Retrieved 15 June 2008 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Clayton, Mark 7 March 2011. The new cyber arms race . The Christian Science Monitor . Archived from the original on 16 April 2015 . Retrieved 16 April 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Nakashima, Ellen 13 September 2016. Obama to be urged to split cyberwar command from NSA . The Washington Post . Archived from the original on 18 May 2017 . Retrieved 15 June 2017 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Overland, Indra 1 March 2019. The geopolitics of renewable energy Debunking four emerging myths. Energy Research  Social Science . 49  3640. doi  10.1016j.erss.2018.10.018 . ISSN   2214-6296 .  Maness, Ryan C. Valeriano, Brandon 11 June 2018. How We Stopped Worrying about Cyber Doom and Started Collecting Data. Politics and Governance . 6 2 4960. doi  10.17645pag.v6i2.1368 . ISSN   2183-2463 .  Maness, Ryan C. Valeriano, Brandon 25 March 2015. The Impact of Cyber Conflict on International Interactions. Armed Forces  Society . 42 2 301323. doi  10.11770095327x15572997 . ISSN   0095-327X .  Burning Glass Technologies, Cybersecurity Jobs, 2015   . July 2015. Archived from the original on 11 June 2016 . Retrieved 11 June 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Oltsik, Jon 18 March 2016. Cybersecurity Skills Shortage Impact on Cloud Computing . Network World . Archived from the original on 23 March 2016 . Retrieved 23 March 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Demand for Cybersecurity Workers Outstripping Supply . 30 July 2015. Archived from the original on 28 May 2016 . Retrieved 12 June 2016 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help  Burning Glass Technologies, Demand for Cybersecurity Workers Outstripping Supply, 30 July 2015, accessed 2016-06-11  de Silva, Richard 11 October 2011. Government vs. Commerce The Cyber Security Industry and You Part One . Defence IQ. Archived from the original on 24 April 2014 . Retrieved 24 April 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Department of Computer Science . Archived from the original on 3 June 2013 . Retrieved 30 April 2013 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Information for Students . NICCS US National Initiative for Cybercareers and Studies. Archived from the original on 23 February 2014 . Retrieved 24 April 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Current Job Opportunities at DHS . U.S. Department of Homeland Security. Archived from the original on 2 May 2013 . Retrieved 5 May 2013 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cybersecurity Training  Exercises . U.S. Department of Homeland Security. 12 May 2010. Archived from the original on 7 January 2015 . Retrieved 9 January 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Cyber Security Awareness Free Training and Webcasts . MS-ISAC Multi-State Information Sharing  Analysis Center. Archived from the original on 6 January 2015 . Retrieved 9 January 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Security Training Courses . LearnQuest. Archived from the original on 3 October 2014 . Retrieved 9 January 2015 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   DoD Approved 8570 Baseline Certifications . iase.disa.mil . Archived from the original on 21 October 2016. Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   httpsassets.publishing.service.gov.ukgovernmentuploadssystemuploadsattachment_datafile386093The_UK_Cyber_Security_Strategy_Report_on_Progress_and_Forward_Plans_-_De___.pdf  Cyber skills for a vibrant and secure UK .  Confidentiality . Retrieved 31 October 2011 .  Data Integrity . Archived from the original on 6 November 2011 . Retrieved 31 October 2011 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help   Endpoint Security . Archived from the original on 16 March 2014 . Retrieved 15 March 2014 . Cite uses deprecated parameter deadurl  help  Further reading  edit  Costigan, Sean Hennessy, Michael 2016. Cybersecurity A Generic Reference Curriculum . NATO. ISBN   978-9284501960 . httpswww.nato.intnato_static_fl2014assetspdfpdf_2016_1020161025_1610-cybersecurity-curriculum.pdf Kim, Peter 2014. The Hacker Playbook Practical Guide To Penetration Testing . Seattle CreateSpace Independent Publishing Platform . ISBN   978-1494932633 . Lee, Newton 2015. Counterterrorism and Cybersecurity Total Information Awareness 2nd ed.. Springer. ISBN   978-3-319-17243-9 . Montagnani, Maria Lill and Cavallo, Mirta Antonella July 26, 2018.  Cybersecurity and Liability in a Big Data World . SSRN. Singer, P. W. Friedman, Allan 2014. Cybersecurity and Cyberwar What Everyone Needs to Know . Oxford University Press. ISBN   978-0199918119 . Wu, Chwan-Hwa John Irwin, J. David 2013. Introduction to Computer Networks and Cybersecurity . Boca Raton CRC Press. ISBN   978-1466572133 . External links  edit  Wikimedia Commons has media related to Computer security . Computer security at Curlie Cybersecurity Websites v t e Computer science Note This template roughly follows the 2012 ACM Computing Classification System . Hardware Printed circuit board Peripheral Integrated circuit Very Large Scale Integration Systems on Chip SoCs Energy consumption Green computing Electronic design automation Hardware acceleration Computer systems organization Computer architecture Embedded system Real-time computing Dependability Networks Network architecture Network protocol Network components Network scheduler Network performance evaluation Network service Software organization Interpreter Middleware Virtual machine Operating system Software quality Software notations and tools Programming paradigm Programming language Compiler Domain-specific language Modeling language Software framework Integrated development environment Software configuration management Software library Software repository Software development Software development process Requirements analysis Software design Software construction Software deployment Software maintenance Programming team Open-source model Theory of computation Model of computation Formal language Automata theory Computational complexity theory Logic Semantics Algorithms Algorithm design Analysis of algorithms Algorithmic efficiency Randomized algorithm Computational geometry Mathematics of computing Discrete mathematics Probability Statistics Mathematical software Information theory Mathematical analysis Numerical analysis Information systems Database management system Information storage systems Enterprise information system Social information systems Geographic information system Decision support system Process control system Multimedia information system Data mining Digital library Computing platform Digital marketing World Wide Web Information retrieval Security Cryptography Formal methods Security services Intrusion detection system Hardware security Network security Information security Application security Humancomputer interaction Interaction design Social computing Ubiquitous computing Visualization Accessibility Concurrency Concurrent computing Parallel computing Distributed computing Multithreading Multiprocessing Artificial intelligence Natural language processing Knowledge representation and reasoning Computer vision Automated planning and scheduling Search methodology Control method Philosophy of artificial intelligence Distributed artificial intelligence Machine learning Supervised learning Unsupervised learning Reinforcement learning Multi-task learning Cross-validation Graphics Animation Rendering Image manipulation Graphics processing unit Mixed reality Virtual reality Image compression Solid modeling Applied computing E-commerce Enterprise software Computational mathematics Computational physics Computational chemistry Computational biology Computational social science Computational engineering Computational healthcare Digital art Electronic publishing Cyberwarfare Electronic voting Video games Word processing Operations research Educational technology Document management Book Category Portal Outline WikiProject Commons Retrieved from  httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleComputer_security oldid914542760  Categories  Computer security E-commerce Secure communication Computer network security Crime prevention National security Cryptography Cyberwarfare Weapons countermeasures Security technology Cybercrime Information governance Hidden categories CS1 errors deprecated parameters Webarchive template wayback links CS1 maint multiple names authors list CS1 maint archived copy as title CS1 errors missing periodical Articles with short description Use dmy dates from September 2016 Wikipedia articles needing clarification from July 2018 All articles lacking reliable references Articles lacking reliable references from October 2017 All articles with unsourced statements Articles with unsourced statements from March 2019 Articles with unsourced statements from September 2016 Articles containing Chinese-language text Commons category link from Wikidata Articles with Curlie links Articles prone to spam from November 2014